Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.525.174

Allotment of appropriations for school plant facilities—Manual, other materials to guide and provide information to district.

It shall be the duty of the superintendent of public instruction, in consultation with the Washington state department of health, to prepare a manual and/or to specify other materials for the information and guidance of local school district authorities and others responsible for and concerned with the designing, planning, maintenance and operation of school plant facilities for the public schools. In so doing due consideration shall be given to the presentation of information regarding (1) the need for cooperative state-local district action in planning school plant facilities arising out of the cooperative plan for financing said facilities provided for in RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180; (2) procedures in inaugurating and conducting a school plant planning program for a school district; (3) standards for use in determining the selection and development of school sites and in designing, planning, and constructing school buildings to the end that the health, safety, and educational well-being and development of school children will be served; (4) the planning of readily expansible and flexible school buildings to meet the requirements of an increasing school population and a constantly changing educational program; (5) an acceptable school building maintenance program and the necessity therefor; (6) the relationship of an efficient school building operations service to the health and educational progress of pupils; and (7) any other matters regarded by the superintendent as pertinent or related to the purposes and requirements of RCW 28A.525.162 through 28A.525.180.

[ 2006 c 263 s 315; 1990 c 33 s 460; 1979 c 141 s 39; 1974 ex.s. c 56 s 5; 1969 ex.s. c 244 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.47.807, 28.47.807.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.

Severability—1969 ex.s. c 244: See note following RCW 28A.525.162.